src/fst/morphology/stems/subjunctions.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! Subjunction
! ===========


LEXICON Subjunction
ahte                           Cs-VOW ;
!at                             Cs-VOW ; !not smj
dade                           Cs-VOW ;
dadi                           Cs-VOW ;
dagu                           Cs-VOW ; !XXX se degu
danen                          Cs-CONS ;
danen% gå                      Cs-VOW ;
dassta% gå+Use/MT:dassta% gå   Cs-VOW ;
dassátjij% gå                  Cs-CONS ; !MT
dasik                          Cs-CONS ;
degu                           Cs-VOW ;
degå                           Cs-VOW ;
desik                          Cs-CONS ;
! duola% dagu                    Cs-VOW ; !moved to adverbs
gå                             Cs-VOW ;
ihka                           Cs-VOW ;
juhti:juhti               Cs-VOW ;
juhti:juhte               Cs-VOW ;
juhti+Sh:jut                      Cs-CONS ;
jus                            Cs-CONS ;
made                           Cs-VOW ;
!men                            Cs-VOW ; !not smj
nåv% gåk                       Cs-CONS ;
navti% vaj                     Cs-CONS ;
nav% vaj                       Cs-CONS ;
sigi                           Cs-VOW ;
!sihke                         Cs-VOW ; ! mt sme adv
vaj                            Cs-CONS ;
vajku:vajku               Cs-VOW ;
vajku+Sh:vajk                     Cs-CONS ;
vaják                          Cs-CONS ;
val                            Cs-VOW ;
!valla                         Cs-VOW ; CC only.
vájku+Sh:vájk                     Cs-CONS ;
vájku:vájku               Cs-VOW ;
ájnat                          Cs-CONS ;
åvddål% gå                     Cs-VOW ;
åvddåla% gå                    Cs-VOW ;
sæmmi% bále                    Cs-VOW ;
váj                            Cs-CONS ;
dav% båttåv% gå+Use/MT:dav% båttåv% gå Cs-CONS ; ! sme dan botta go
dallutjij% gå+Use/MT:dallutjij% gå Cs-CONS ; !sme dassážiigo
maŋŋela% gå+Use/MT:maŋŋela% gå Cs-CONS ; ! sme maŋŋelgo
dåssju% gå+Use/MT:dåssju% gå Cs-CONS ; ! sme dušše go
navti% ahte+Use/MT:navti% ahte Cs-CONS ; ! sme nu ahte
nåv% guhkás% gå+Use/MT:nåv% guhkás% gå Cs-CONS ; ! sme nu guhkásgo


LEXICON Cs-CONS
+CS+Cltl+Use/MT:#% la # ;  
+CS: # ;


LEXICON Cs-VOW
+CS+Cltl+Use/MT:#% l # ;  
+CS: # ;
